Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2757.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 45-553, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE45-553. Transportation of groundwater withdrawn in Butler Valley groundwater A. the La Paz county board of supervisors may withdraw groundwater may be withdrawn from land owned by this state or by a political subdivision of this state that La Paz county owns or leases in the Butler Valley groundwater basin for transportation to an initial active management area outside of the Butler Valley groundwater basin, subject to either of the following conditions: 1. The groundwater is used solely by the county or by a political subdivision or municipal provider located within the county for the county's, political subdivision's or municipal provider's own use. 2. The groundwater is sold or leased to a multi-county water conservation district established pursuant to title 48, chapter 22 for use only by the multi-county water conservation district to meet the district's replenishment obligations. B. Title to land in the Butler Valley groundwater basin that is owned by this state or a political subdivision of this state and from which groundwater is withdrawn for transportation to an initial active management area for the purposes of this section may be sold, exchanged or otherwise conveyed only to this state or to another political subdivision of this state La Paz county. END_STATUTE